Washington statutes.
RCW 15.125.020

Rule-making authority.

(1) The department may adopt rules establishing:

(a) Standards for cannabis and cannabis products produced and processed in a manner consistent with, to the extent practicable, 7 C.F.R. Part 205;

(b) A self-sustaining program for certifying cannabis producers and cannabis processors as meeting the standards established under (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Other rules as necessary for administration of this chapter.

(2) To the extent practicable, the program must be consistent with the program established by the director under chapter 15.86 RCW.

(3) The rules must include a fee schedule that will provide for the recovery of the full cost of the program including, but not limited to, application processing, inspections, sampling and testing, notifications, public awareness programs, and enforcement.

[ 2022 c 16 s 15; 2017 c 317 s 19.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Application—2017 c 317: See notes following RCW 69.50.325.